District of Columbia statutes.
8-2033

Exception.

(a)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any owner or operator of a locally assisted housing accommodation for elderly persons or persons with disabilities or any local housing authority from requiring the removal from any rental unit any common household pet whose conduct or condition is duly determined to constitute a threat or nuisance to the health or safety of the other occupants of the housing accommodation. The owner or operator of a locally assisted housing accommodation shall regulate pet ownership in accordance with rules established pursuant to § 8-2035.

(b)

No pet shall be kept in violation of health statutes or under circumstances constituting cruelty to animals as set forth in § 22-1001.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-181, § 4, 35 DCR 7715
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 31(c), 53 DCR 6198

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 8-2203.
1981 Ed., § 6-1023.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-305, in subsec. (a), substituted “elderly persons or persons with disabilities” for “the elderly or handicapped”.